Hawaii statutes.
§174C-44 Ground water criteria for
designation. In designating an area for water use regulation, the
commission shall consider the following:

(1) Whether an increase in water use or authorized
planned use may cause the maximum rate of withdrawal from the ground water
source to reach ninety per cent of the sustainable yield of the proposed ground
water management area;

(2) There is an actual or threatened water quality
degradation as determined by the department of health;

(3) Whether regulation is necessary to preserve the
diminishing ground water supply for future needs, as evidenced by excessively
declining ground water levels;

(4) Whether the rates, times, spatial patterns, or
depths of existing withdrawals of ground water are endangering the stability or
optimum development of the ground water body due to upconing or encroachment of
salt water;

(5) Whether the chloride contents of existing wells
are increasing to levels which materially reduce the value of their existing
uses;

(6) Whether excessive preventable waste of ground
water is occurring;

(7) Serious disputes respecting the use of ground
water resources are occurring; or

(8) Whether water development projects that have
received any federal, state, or county approval may result, in the opinion of
the commission, in one of the above conditions.

Notwithstanding an imminent designation of a
ground water management area conditioned on a rise in the rate of ground water
withdrawal to a level of ninety per cent of the area's sustainable yield, the
commission, when such level reaches the eighty per cent level of the
sustainable yield, may invite the participation of water users in the affected
area to an informational hearing for the purposes of assessing the ground water
situation and devising mitigative measures. [L 1987, c 45, pt of §2; am L 1999,
c 197, §6]

Case Notes

Commission did not
err in regulating the Waiahole Ditch infrastructure as a unified system as
independent designation of water management areas does not preclude
consolidated regulation where a water delivery system draws water from several
different water management areas and the consolidated regulation of a single
diversion works comports entirely with the commission's function of
comprehensive water planning and management. 94 H. 97, 9 P.3d 409.

Given the undisputed
direct interrelationship between the surface and ground waters in the Waiahole
Ditch case, the designation of Windward Oahu as a ground water management area
subjects both ground and surface water diversions from the designated area to
the statutory permit requirement. 94 H. 97, 9 P.3d 409.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next